North Dakota, session 69, HB1446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-03-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-03-14. State party convention.
1. The party state committee shall set the place and time of the state party convention to
be held in each general election year. Subject to party rules and bylaws, the state
party convention may:
a. Nominate the legal number of elector nominees and alternate elector nominees
for its party for the offices of presidential electors. The nominees must be
qualified electors of this state.
b. Elect the required number of delegates and alternates to the national party
convention.
c. Endorse candidates as provided under subsection 2.
Page No. 1 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. The candidate or candidates for endorsement or election must be declared endorsed
or elected under the rules of the party, and the chairman and secretary of the
convention shall issue certificates of endorsement as provided in section 16.1-11-06 or
certificates of election. The names of the qualified electors nominated for presidential
electors the party wishes to place on the general election ballot must be certified by
the chairman and secretary of the convention to the secretary of state by four p.m. on
the sixty-fourth day before the general election to be placed upon the general election
ballot as provided in section 16.1-06-07.1.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-03-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-03-21. Organizations allowed to nominate statewide and legislative candidates.
A political organization may not endorse candidates or have candidates petition for
president, vice president, Congress, statewide office, or legislative office as set forth in
chapter 16.1-11, unless the organization:
1. Organized according to all requirements of this chapter;
2. Had printed on the ballot at the last preceding general election the names of a set of
presidential electors pledged to the election of the party's candidate for president and
vice president, a candidate for governor, a candidate for attorney general, or a
candidate for secretary of state and those candidates for presidential electors,
governor, attorney general, or secretary of state received at least five percent of the
total vote cast for presidential electors, the office of governor, attorney general, or
secretary of state within this state at that election and organized according to all
requirements of this chapter; or
3. Filed a petition with the secretary of state signed by the number of electors required
under section 16.1-11-30 to qualify to endorse candidates or to have candidates
petition to be included on the primary election ballot in a consolidated column or on a
special election ballot.
4. A candidate for Congress, statewide office, or legislative office endorsed according to
a party's bylaws may appear on a primary election ballot only through a nominating
petition under section 16.1 - 11 - 06 .
Page No. 2 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. Notwithstanding subsection 4, if a state party entitled to ballot access under
16.1 - 11 - 30 fails to be represented by an individual through a nominating petition for a
statewide elected office seventy - one days before the primary election, the state party
may appoint an individual to represent the party for that office under bylaws adopted
by the state party. Upon appointment, the state party shall issue a notification of
appointment to the appointee, which must contain the appointee's name, mailing
address, and telephone number. The appointee shall file the notification of
appointment with the secretary of state within the time prescribed under section
16.1 - 11 - 10 .
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 16.1-08.1-02.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Prior to the thirty-first day before a primary, general, or special election, a candidate or
candidate committee formed on behalf of the candidate, a multicandidate political
committee, or a political party other than a statewide political party soliciting or
accepting contributions shall file a campaign disclosure statement that includes all
contributions received from January first through the fortieth day before the election. A
candidate whose name is not on the ballot and who is not seeking election through
write-in votes, the candidate's candidate committee, and a political party that has not
endorsed or nominated any candidate in the election is not required to file a statement
under this subsection. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on the
thirty-ninth day before the election. The statement must include:
a. For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two
hundred dollars received during the reporting period:
(1) The name and mailing address of the contributor;
(2) The total amount of the contribution; and
(3) The date the last contributed amount was received;
b. The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of
two hundred dollars during the reporting period;
c. The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two
hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period; and
Page No. 3 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. For a statewide candidate, a candidate committee formed on behalf of a
statewide candidate, and a statewide multicandidate committee, the balance of
the campaign fund on the fortieth day before the election and the balance of the
campaign fund on January first.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 16.1-08.1-02.4 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Prior to the thirty-first day before a primary, general, or special election, a statewide
political party or a political committee not required to file statements under section
16.1-08.1-02.3 which is soliciting or accepting contributions shall file a campaign
disclosure statement that includes all contributions received and expenditures made
from January first through the fortieth day before the election. A political party that has
not endorsed or nominated a candidate in an election is not required to file a
statement under this subsection. A statement required to be filed under this subsection
may be submitted for filing beginning on the thirty-ninth day before the election. The
statement must include:
a. For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two
hundred dollars received during the reporting period:
(1) The name and mailing address of the contributor;
(2) The total amount of the contribution; and
(3) The date the last contributed amount was received;
b. The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of
two hundred dollars during the reporting period;
c. The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two
hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period;
d. For each recipient of an expenditure from campaign funds in excess of two
hundred dollars in the aggregate:
(1) The name and mailing address of the recipient;
(2) The total amount of the expenditure made to the recipient; and
(3) The date the last expended amount was made to the recipient;
e. The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds in excess of two
hundred dollars;
Page No. 4 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds of two hundred
dollars or less; and
g. The balance of the campaign fund on the fortieth day before the election and
balance of the campaign fund on January first.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-09-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-09-02. Statement of interests to be filed.
1. Every candidate for elective office shall sign and file the statement of interests as
required by this chapter. In a year when a president and vice president of the United
States are to be chosen, presidential and vice presidential candidates shall file with
the secretary of state either a statement of interests as required by this chapter or a
copy of the personal disclosure statement that is required by the federal election
commission. Candidates for elective office who are required to file such statements
shall do so with the filing officer for that election at the time of filing a certificate of
nomination, a certificate of endorsement, a petition of nomination, or a certificate of
write-in candidacy, pursuant to chapter 16.1-11, 16.1-12, or 40-21, as is appropriate.
2. An individual who has filed a statement as the result of candidacy in a primary election
need not refile before running in the following general election. A write-in candidate
who is not required to file a certificate of write-in candidacy shall file the statement of
interests after the candidate's election at the time of filing the required oath of office.
Every individual who is appointed by the governor to a state agency, board, bureau,
commission, department, or occupational or professional licensing board shall file a
statement of interests as required by this chapter with the secretary of state
simultaneously with announcement of the appointment.
3. A filing officer may not include a candidate's name on the ballot if an error is
discovered on the statement and the candidate is unable to or refuses to make the
necessary correction before the sixty-fourth day before the election.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 5 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1-11-06. State candidate's nominating petition or political party certificate of
endorsement required to get name on ballot - Contents - Filing.
1. Every candidate for United States senator, United States representative, a
statestatewide office, including the office of state senator or state representative, and
judges of the supreme and district courts shall present a nominating petition to the
secretary of state, between the first date candidatesa candidate may begin circulating
a nominating petitions according topetition under this chapter and before four p.m. of
the sixty-fourth day before any primary election, either:
a. The certificate of endorsement signed by the state or district chairman of any
legally recognized political party containing the candidate's name, post-office
address, nongovernment issued electronic mail address, and telephone number,
the title of the office to which the candidate aspires, and the party which the
candidate represents; or
b.2. The nominating petition containing the followingmust include:
(1)a. The candidate's name, post-office address, nongovernment issued electronic
mail address, and telephone number, and the title of the office to which the
candidate aspires, the appropriate district judgeship number if applicable, and
whether the petition is intended for nomination for an unexpired term of office if
applicable.
(2)b. The name of the party the candidate represents if the petition is for an office
under party designation.
(3)c. The signatures and printed names of qualified electors, the number of which
must be determined as follows:
(a) (1) If the office is a statewide office under a party or no - party designation, the
signatures of three percent of the total vote cast for the candidates of the
party with which the candidate affiliates for the same position at the last
general election. However, no more than three hundredcandidate must
collect at least two thousand signatures may be required.
(b) (2) If there was no candidate of a party for a position at the preceding general
election, at least three hundred signatures.
Page No. 6 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(c) (3) If the office is under the no-party designation but is not a statewide office, at
least three hundred signatures.
(d) (4) If the office is a legislative office, the signatures of at least one percent of
the total resident population of the legislative district as determined by the
most recent federal decennial census.
(4)d. The mailing address and the date of signing for each signer.
2.3. If the nominating petition or certificate of endorsement is for the office of governor and
lieutenant governor, the nominating petition or certificate must contain the names and
other information required of candidates for both offices.
3.4. A nominating petition or certificate of endorsement may be filed electronically, through
the mail, or by personal delivery. However, the nominating petition or certificate must
be complete and in the possession of the secretary of state before four p.m. of the
sixty-fourth day before the primary election.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-10. Applicant's name placed upon ballot - Affidavit to accompany petition.
1. Upon receipt by the secretary of state of the petition or certificate of endorsement
provided for inunder section 16.1-11-06, or a notification of appointment under section
16.1 - 03 - 21 , accompanied by the following affidavit, the secretary of state shall place
the applicant's name upon the primary election ballot in the columns of the applicant's
party as provided or within the no-party office for which the applicant desires
nomination.
2. Upon receipt by the county auditor of the petition provided for in section 16.1-11-11
accompanied by the following affidavit, the county auditor shall place the applicant's
name upon the primary election ballot within the no-party office for which the applicant
desires nomination. The affidavit may be filed electronically, through the mail, or by
personal delivery. However, the affidavit must be in the possession of the appropriate
filing officer before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the primary election. If the
affidavit is filed electronically, the candidate shall retain the original copy.
3. The affidavit must be substantially as follows:
State of North Dakota )
Page No. 7 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
) ss.
County of ________ )
I, ______________, being sworn, say that I reside at ________________, in the city
of _______________, in the county of ______________ of North Dakota; and zip code of
________________; that I am a candidate for nomination to the office of _____________
to be chosen at the primary election to be held on _____________, ______, and I request
that my name be printed upon the primary election ballot as provided by law, as a
candidate of the ______________ party for said office. I am requesting that my name be
listed on the ballot as I have identified my ballot name below. I understand that nicknames
are allowed as part of my ballot name, but titles and campaign slogans are not permissible.
I have reviewed the requirements to hold office and I certify that I am qualified to serve if
elected.
_______________________________________
Ballot name requested
_______________________________________
Candidate's signature
Subscribed and sworn to before me on ______________, _____.
________________________________________
Notary Public
NOTARY SEAL My Commission Expires ____________________
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-11. County candidates' petitions - Filing - Contents.
Every candidate for a county office shall present a petition to the county auditor of the
county in which the candidate resides between the first date candidates may begin circulating
nominating petitions according to this chapter and four p.m. of the sixty-fourth day before any
primary election. The petition or certificate of endorsement may be filed electronically, through
the mail, or by personal delivery. However, the petition or certificate of endorsement must be
complete and in the possession of the county auditor before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day
before the primary election. A petition under this section must include the following:
Page No. 8 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. The candidate's name, post-office address, nongovernment issued electronic mail
address, and telephone number, the title of the office to which the candidate aspires,
the appropriate district number if applicable, and whether the petition is intended for
nomination for an unexpired term of office if applicable.
2. The printed names and signatures of qualified electors, the number of which must be
determined as follows:
a. If the office is a county office, the signatures of not less than two percent of the
total vote cast for the office at the most recent general election at which the office
was voted upon.
b. If the office is a county office and multiple candidates were elected to the office at
the preceding general election at which the office was voted upon, the signatures
of not less than two percent of the votes cast for all candidates divided by the
number of candidates that were to be elected to that office.
c. If the office is a county office and no candidate was elected or no votes were cast
for the office at any general election, the number of signers equal to at least
two percent of the total average vote cast for the offices of sheriff and county
auditor at the most recent general election at which those officers were elected in
the petitioner's county. This average must be determined by dividing by two the
total vote cast for those offices.
d. In no case may more than three hundred signatures be required.
3. The residential address, mailing address (if different from residential address), and
date of signing for each signer. A post office box does not qualify as a residential
address. In areas of the state where street addresses are not available, a description
of where the residential address is located must be used.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-12. Applicant's name placed on ballot.
1. Upon receipt of the petition or certificate of endorsement provided for in section
16.1-11-06, accompanied by an affidavit as provided in section 16.1-11-10, the
secretary of state shall place the name of the applicant on the primary election ballot in
Page No. 9 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the party or appropriate section if the documentation meets all applicable
requirements.
2. Upon receipt of the petition or certificate of endorsement provided for in section
16.1-11-11, accompanied by an affidavit as provided in section 16.1-11-10, the county
auditor shall place the name of the applicant on the appropriate section of the no-party
primary election ballot if the documentation meets all applicable requirements.
3. A candidate whose name was placed on the ballot under this section may have the
candidate's name removed from the ballot by submitting a written request to the
appropriate filing officer within forty-eight hours after the filing deadline under sections
16.1-11-06 and 16.1-11-11.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-18. Filling vacancy occurring in endorsement or nomination by petition for
party office.
1. If a vacancy occurs in any party certificate of endorsement at the primary election for any
state or legislative district office, the proper state or district executive committee of the political
party may fill the vacancy by filing another certificate of endorsement with the secretary of state
as provided in section 16.1-11-06.
2. If no party endorsement has been made by certificate and a vacancy occurs in a slate of
candidates seeking party nomination by petition at the primary election, the proper state or
district executive committee may fill the vacancy by filing a certificate of endorsement with the
secretary of statemay be filled by petition as provided in section 16.1-11-06.
3. If party endorsements by certificate have been made for any state or district office and
a vacancy occurs in the slate of individuals seeking nomination at the primary election
because of the unavailability of the individual who is seeking nomination by petition,
that vacancy may not be filled except by petition.
4. Vacancies to be filled according to the provisions of this section may be filled not later
than the sixty-fourth day before the election.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 10 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1-11-30. Separate section on primary election ballot required for each political
party.
1. Any party that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding presidential election the
names of a set of presidential electors pledged to the election of the party's candidates
for president and vice president or a candidate for governor and those candidates for
presidential electors or governor received at least five percent of the total vote cast for
presidential electors or the office of governor within this state at that election; any party
that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding nonpresidential election a candidate
for attorney general or secretary of state, and the candidate received at least five
percent of the total vote cast for the office the candidate was seeking at the election;
or any party that has organized according to all the requirements of chapter 16.1-03
must be provided with a separate section on primary election ballots.
2. Any other political organization is entitled to endorse candidates or have candidates
petition to be included on the primary ballot in a separate section of the consolidated
primary election ballot, if a petition signed by at least seven thousand qualified electors
of this state is filed with the secretary of state before four p.m. of the sixty-fourth day
before a primary or special election, naming the political organization, stating the
platform principles of the party, and requesting the names of its candidates to be
included on the state's primary ballot in a separate section. Political organizations that
are granted ballot access under this section are allowed ballot access only for those
offices for which the organization has identified candidates. Regardless of the means
by which the petition is delivered, the original must be in the possession of the
secretary of state before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day prior to a primary or special
election. Candidates of that party are entitled to the same rights and privileges as
those of other parties. Petitions circulated according to this section must be filed with
the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-01-50.
3. A political organization that had printed on the ballot at the last preceding presidential
election the names of a set of presidential electors pledged to the election of the
party's candidates for president and vice president or a candidate for governor and
those candidates for presidential electors or governor received at least five percent of
the total vote cast for presidential electors or the office of governor within this state at
Page No. 11 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
that election, and any political organization that has printed on the ballot at the last
preceding nonpresidential election a candidate for attorney general or secretary of
state, and the candidate received at least five percent of the total vote cast for the
office the candidate was seeking at the election are entitled to organize according to
the requirements of chapter 16.1-03.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-11-39 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-11-39. Individuals nominated in accordance with provisions of chapter eligible
as candidates in general election.
1. All individuals nominated in accordance with this chapter are eligible as candidates to
be voted for at the ensuing general election, except as provided in this section.
2. Upon receipt of the documents filed by each candidate, the filing officer immediately
shall complete a thorough review of the documents and notify the candidate of any
necessary corrections that must be made before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day
before the primary election. The filing officer may not place a candidate's name on the
primary election ballot if the filed documents are insufficient and remain uncorrected.
3. If the filing officer discovers, after four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the primary
election, an insufficiency in the certificate of endorsement or petition or affidavit of
candidacy filed by a candidate, the candidate may not be deemed nominated until the
insufficiency is corrected. Upon discovery of the insufficiency, the filing officer
immediately shall notify the candidate in writing of the necessary corrections. The
candidate shall file the necessary corrections as soon as practicable, but not later than
four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the general election.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 16.1-12-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection 3, if the nomination is for an office to be filled by the
qualified electors of the entire state, there must be no fewer than one thousandtwo
thousand signatures.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-12-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 12 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
16.1-12-09. Filling vacancy existing on no-party ballot - Petition required - Time of
filing.
1. Whenever a vacancy exists on a no-party ballot for a state office or for judge of a
district court, the vacancy may be filled by filing with the secretary of state, before
four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day, a written petition as provided in section 16.1-11-06,
stating that the petitioner desires to become a candidate for election to the office for
which a vacancy exists. The petition for the nomination of any individual to fill the
vacancy must be signed by qualified electors equal in number to at least two percent
of the total vote cast for the office of governor in the state or district, at the most recent
general election at which the office of governor was voted upon, but in no case may
more than three hundred signatures be required.
2. Whenever a vacancy exists on a no-party ballot in a county or district within a county,
the vacancy may be filled by filing with the county auditor before four p.m. of the sixty-
fourth day a written petition as provided in section 16.1-11-11, stating the petitioner
desires to become a candidate for election to the office for which a vacancy exists.
The petition for the nomination of any individual to fill the vacancy must be signed by
qualified electors equal in number to at least thirty percent of the total vote cast for the
office of governor at the most recent general election in the county or district at which
the office of governor was voted upon, but in no case may more than three hundred
signatures be required.
3. A vacancy in the no-party ballot must be deemed to exist when:
a. A candidate nominated at the primary election dies, resigns, or otherwise
becomes disqualified to have the candidate's name printed on the ballot at the
general election.
b. No candidates were nominated at the primary election because the office did not
yet exist.
c. The timing of the vacancy in an office makes it impossible to have the office
placed on the ballot.
4. The petition or certificate of endorsement may be filed electronically, through the mail,
or by personal delivery, and must be complete and in the possession of the filing
officer before four p.m. on the sixty-fourth day before the general or special election.
Page No. 13 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-13-08.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
16.1-13-08.1. Special election to fill a vacancy in the United States House of
Representatives due to a catastrophic circumstance.
If a vacancy occurs in the office of representative in Congress due to a catastrophic
circumstance in which one hundred or more representatives across the United States are no
longer able to serve and the next regular or special election is more than seventy-five days in
the future, the governor shall immediately issue a writ of election calling a special election to fill
the vacancy. The date of the election shall be forty-nine days from the date of the proclamation
and the following deadlines shall apply:
1. Certificate of endorsement as described in section 16.1-11-09 subsection 6 , affidavits
of candidacy described in section 16.1-11-10, and statements of interest described in
section 16.1-09-03 for those candidates nominated by political parties currently
established in the state shall be filed with the secretary of state by four p.m. on the
fortieth day before the election.
2. If the election occurs in an election year, the precincts previously established by the
county shall be utilized.
3. If the election occurs in a year without a scheduled election, the board of county
commissioners must establish the precinct boundaries by the fortieth day before the
election.
4. The secretary of state shall certify to the county auditors the names of the candidates
for the election on the thirty-ninth day before the election.
5. Absentee ballots shall be made available to qualified electors by the thirtieth day
before the election.
6. A certificate of endorsement filed with the secretary of state as provided in this section
must be in substantially the following form:
CERTIFICATE OF ENDORSEMENT
I, ______________, do certify that I am the state (district) chairman of the
______________ political party of the ______________ legislative district (if appropriate) of
the state of North Dakota and that ______________ (insert name of endorsee), residing at
____________, whose nongovernment-issued electronic mail address is ______________,
Page No. 14 25.0267.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
was duly endorsed for nomination to the office of ______________ on the
______________ day of __________, by the ______________ political party of the
______________ legislative district (if appropriate), duly convened and organized in
accordance with the bylaws of the ______________ political party and the laws of this
state, and do hereby request ______________ name be printed upon the ballot as a
candidate for nomination to the office of ______________ at the forthcoming primary
election to be held on ______________ of this year.
Dated this ____________ day of _________.
_________________________________________
(signature of state or district chairman)
SECTION 16. REPEAL. Sections 16.1-11-05.1, 16.1-11-09, and 16.1-11-36 of the North
Dakota Century Code are repealed.
Page No. 15 25.0267.03000